Utah statutes.
76-8-809.   Closing or restricting use of highways abutting defense or war
facilities -- Posting of notices.
Any individual, partnership, association, corporation, municipal corporation
or state or any political subdivision thereof engaged in or preparing to
engage in the manufacture, transportation or storage of any product to be used
in the preparation of the United States or any of the states for defense or
for war or in the prosecution of war by the United States, or in the
manufacture, transportation, distribution or storage of gas, oil, coal,
electricity or water, or any of said natural or artificial persons operating
any public utility who has property so used which he or it believes will be
endangered if public use and travel is not restricted or prohibited on one or
more highways or parts thereof upon which the property abuts, may petition the
highway commissioners of any city, town, or county to close one or more of the
highways or parts thereof to public use and travel or to restrict by order the
use and travel upon one or more of the highways or parts thereof.
Upon receipt of the petition, the highway commissioners shall set a day for
hearing and give notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having general
circulation in the city, town, or county in which the property is located and
as required in Section 45-1-101, the publication shall be made at least seven
days prior to the date set for hearing.  If, after hearing, the highway
commissioners determine that the public safety and the safety of the property
of the petitioner so require, they shall by suitable order close to public use
and travel or reasonably restrict the use of and travel upon one or more of
the highways or parts thereof; provided the highway commissioners may issue
written permits to travel over the highway so closed or restricted to
responsible and reputable persons for a term, under conditions and in a form
as the commissioners may prescribe.  Appropriate notices in letters at least
three inches high shall be posted conspicuously at each end of any highway so
closed or restricted by an order.  The highway commissioners may at any time
revoke or modify any order so made.
